Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20208-209
Pledge of securities with Department of Banking and Finance; amount required.

(1) Any corporation organized to do business as a trust company under the Nebraska Trust Company Act shall make a pledge with the Department of Banking and Finance of approved securities.

(2) The amount of securities required to be pledged shall be based on the market value of trust assets held by the trust company as follows:

(a) Trust companies with trust assets with a market value of less than twenty-five million dollars shall pledge securities in the amount of one hundred thousand dollars in par value;

(b) Trust companies with trust assets with a market value of at least twenty-five million dollars but less than two hundred fifty million dollars shall pledge securities in the amount of two hundred thousand dollars in par value;

(c) Trust companies with trust assets with a market value of at least two hundred fifty million dollars but less than two billion five hundred million dollars shall pledge securities in the amount of three hundred thousand dollars in par value;

(d) Trust companies with trust assets with a market value of at least two billion five hundred million dollars but less than five billion dollars shall pledge securities in the amount of four hundred thousand dollars in par value; and

(e) Trust companies with trust assets with a market value of five billion dollars or more shall pledge securities in the amount of five hundred thousand dollars in par value.

(3) A trust company shall determine the market value of its trust assets at the end of each calendar year. If such valuation shows that the pledge of securities is less than is required by subsection (2) of this section, the trust company shall increase the amount of the securities pledged with the department within sixty days following the end of the calendar year.

(4) If at any time the market value of pledged assets is determined to have depreciated to less than ninety percent of par value or the trust company has trust funds deposited with itself or its supporting commercial bank in excess of those deposits referred to by section 8-212, the Director of Banking and Finance may require additional pledges in amounts deemed necessary to fully secure pledging requirements or excessive trust fund depository balances.

(5) Any national bank authorized by the Office of the Comptroller of the Currency or the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System to act in a fiduciary capacity in this state, any out-of-state bank authorized by its home state regulator to act in a fiduciary capacity in this state, any federal savings association authorized by the Office of the Comptroller of the Currency to act in a fiduciary capacity in this state, any federally chartered trust company, any out-of-state trust company authorized under the Interstate Trust Company Office Act or otherwise doing business in this state, and any out-of-state entity acting in a fiduciary capacity in this state shall make similar pledges with the department, and all such deposits held by the department shall be considered as having been lawfully so pledged and subject to the Nebraska Trust Company Act.

Laws 1911, c. 31, § 9, p. 192;

R.S.1913, § 746;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XVIII, § 9, p. 721;

C.S.1922, § 8071;

C.S.1929, § 8-209;

Laws 1933, c. 18, § 75, p. 174;

Laws 1939, c. 3, § 1, p. 59;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 8-209;

R.S.1943, § 8-209;

Laws 1993, LB 81, § 23;

Laws 1998, LB 1321, § 39;

Laws 2009, LB327, § 7;

Laws 2012, LB963, § 5;

Laws 2019, LB258, § 7.

Interstate Trust Company Office Act, see section 8-2301.